Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5835YC (2) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Direct each institution of higher 3 education governed by the board to establish a policy whereby 4 the tuition amount charged to students classified as residents 5 that is charged to an undergraduate student in the studentâs 6 first academic year of enrollment, commencing with a first 7 academic year of enrollment beginning in or after 2027, will 8 not increase in the studentâs subsequent academic years of 9 undergraduate enrollment. For a student who begins their first 10 academic year of undergraduate enrollment with sufficient 11 academic transfer credits that the student can complete a 12 baccalaureate degree program in less than four academic years, 13 this requirement only applies for the number of academic years 14 necessary for the student to complete a degree program with 15 their academic transfer credits, rounded up. This subsection 16 does not apply to any academic years beyond three consecutive 17 academic years of undergraduate enrollment after a studentâs 18 first academic year of enrollment. 19